South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3744.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  It is proposed that Section 7, Article III of the Constitution of this State be amended by adding a new paragraph at the end to read: "The General Assembly may by law enact limitations upon the number of terms, either consecutive or aggregated, that its member may serve either in the Senate or the House of Representatives." SECTION 2.  The proposed amendment must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next general election for representatives.  Ballots must be provided at the various voting precincts with the following words printed or written on the ballot: "Must Section 7, Article III of the Constitution of this State, relating to qualifications of members of the Senate and House of Representatives, be amended so as to authorize the General Assembly to enact statutory limitations upon the number of terms, either consecutive or aggregated, that its members may serve in either the Senate or the House of Representatives? Yes     o No      o Those voting in favor of the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'Yes', and those voting against the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'No'." ----XX----